District of Columbia statutes.
28:1-105

Severability.

If any provision or clause of this subtitle or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this subtitle which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this subtitle are severable.

Dec. 30, 1963, 77 Stat. 632, Pub. L. 88-243, § 1
Apr. 27, 2013, D.C. Law 19-299, § 2, 60 DCR 2634

Source: Former Section 1-108.

Changes from former law: Except for changing the form of reference to the Uniform Commercial Code, this section is identical to former Section 1-108.

1. This is the model severability section recommended by the National Conference of Commissioners on Uniform State Laws for inclusion in all acts of extensive scope.

1973 Ed., § 28:1-108.
1981 Ed., § 28:1-108.
2001 Ed., § 28:1-108.